Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1373.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definition of "recipient" in section 1401 of the act of June 13, 1967 (P.L.31, No.21), known as the Human Services Code, are amended and the section is amended by adding definitions to read:Section 1401. Definitions.--The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the meanings given to them in this section:"Claim" means a request for payment under the medical assistance program.* * *"National Provider Identifier" or "NPI" means the national unique health identifier issued to a health care provider under 1234567891011121314151617181920 45 CFR Pt. 162 Subpt. D (relating to standard unique health identifier for health care providers)."Person" means any individual, facility or entity.* * *"Recipient" means an [eligible person who receives medical assistance from a participating provider.] individual who receives goods or services from a provider reimbursable under the medical assistance program."Record" means any of the following:(1) Any information in written, electronic or any other format created, received or retained, or required to be created, received or retained, by a person under the medical assistance program, including, but not limited to, medical, professional, financial or business documents which relate to:(i) the treatment or care of a recipient;(ii) goods or services provided to a recipient; or (iii) rates paid for goods or services provided to a recipient.(2) Any document in written, electronic or any other format that is required by the rules or regulations of the department to be retained by a provider under the medical assistance program.* * *Section 2. Section 1406 of the act is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 1406. Restrictions on Provider Charges and Payments.--* * *(c) (1) A provider shall submit information in a manner and format as prescribed by the department in accordance with Federal law, including the 21st Century Cures Act (Public Law 20260SB1373PN1788 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 114-255, 130 Stat. 1033).(2) Electronic visit information reported shall include all information under the definition of "electronic visit verification system" under 42 U.S.C. § 1396b(l)(5)(A) (relating to payment to states).(3) The department or its contractors may deny a claim for noncompliance with the reporting requirements of this subsection.Section 3. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1406.1. Claim Submissions.--(a) (1) The department shall require every individual who delivers a health care service in the home or the community which is not billed as a per diem service under the medical assistance program to obtain a National Provider Identifier.(2) Clause (1) applies regardless of whether the individual who delivers the health care service is the billing provider.(b) All claims submitted for payment under the medical assistance program for a health care service in the home or community which is not billed as a per diem service, whether to the department or any entity contracted with the department under the medical assistance program, must include the following:(1) The NPI issued to the individual delivering the goods or services to the recipient.(2) The Medicaid provider number for the provider.(3) Each date that goods or services were provided.(4) The start and end time for each service provided.(c) The department, in consultation with the Office of Attorney General Medicaid Fraud Control Section, shall establish a standardized medical assistance fraud recognition and training 20260SB1373PN1788 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 program for both individuals who deliver a health care service in the home or community and entities that provide financial management services.(d) Notwithstanding any other provision in this section, the department shall comply with Federal requirements regarding the prompt payment of claims.Section 4. The Department of Human Services shall promulgate rules and regulations necessary to implement the provisions of this act in a manner which:(1) Does not interrupt the provision of care to recipients enrolled under the medical assistance program.(2) Provides a reasonable amount of time for current providers participating in the medical assistance program to comply with the provisions of this act while still participating in the program.Section 5. This act shall take effect in 90 days.20260SB1373PN1788 - 4 - 12345678910111213141516